Utah statutes.
41-1a-1205.   Disposition of driver education tax -- Expense appropriation.

(1)  The automobile driver education tax collected under Section 41-1a-1204 shall be placed to the credit of the Automobile Driver Education Tax Account within the Uniform School Fund.

(2)  The necessary expenses of the commission incurred in the administration and collection of the tax shall be paid from its legislative appropriation in the General Fund, which fund shall be reimbursed by a transfer for the expenses from the legislative appropriation of the Uniform School Fund.

